dev/adverb/adverb.ne.dix
  <!-- जाँ; जाँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जाँ__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चीजहरूभन्दा; चीजहरूभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चीजहरूभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वायुभन्दा; वायुभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वायुभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पढ्नुभन्दा; पढ्नुभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पढ्नुभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भोलि-भोलि; भोलि-भोलि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भोलि-भोलि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अवस्य; अवस्य; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अवस्य__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बाबुभन्दा; बाबुभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बाबुभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लमतन्न; लमतन्न; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लमतन्न__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गललल; गललल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गललल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बरर्र; बरर्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बरर्र__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भएपश्चात; भएपश्चात; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भएपश्चात__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यतिञ्जेल; त्यतिञ्जेल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यतिञ्जेल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खुव; खुव; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खुव__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्वाभावतया; स्वाभावतया; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्वाभावतया__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- समाधानार्थ; समाधानार्थ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="समाधानार्थ__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नचाही-नचाहीकन; नचाही-नचाहीकन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नचाही-नचाहीकन__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वाहिरै; वाहिरै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वाहिरै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- याँ; याँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="याँ__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पाउनेवित्तिकै; पाउनेवित्तिकै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पाउनेवित्तिकै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- माथी; माथी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="माथी__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एक-दुइपल्ट; एक-दुइपल्ट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एक-दुइपल्ट__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जानाजानी; जानाजानी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जानाजानी__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बल्लतल्ल; बल्लतल्ल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बल्लतल्ल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नमिले; नमिले; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नमिले__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पूर्णरुपेण; पूर्णरुपेण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पूर्णरुपेण__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- थचक्क; थचक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="थचक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हतनपत; हतनपत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हतनपत__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आजकाल; आजकाल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आजकाल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गंम्भीरतापूर्वक; गंम्भीरतापूर्वक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गंम्भीरतापूर्वक__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अघिपछि; अघिपछि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अघिपछि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अघिल्; अघिल्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अघिल्__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शुरूमानै; शुरूमानै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शुरूमानै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यहाँ; त्यहाँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यहाँ__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्वाँ-स्वाँ; स्वाँ-स्वाँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्वाँ-स्वाँ__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बिरुद्ध; बिरुद्ध; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बिरुद्ध__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जनमनोभावानुकूल; जनमनोभावानुकूल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जनमनोभावानुकूल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एकपटक; एकपटक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एकपटक__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यहीबेला; त्यहीबेला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यहीबेला__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जहींतहीं; जहींतहीं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जहींतहीं__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गम्भीरतापूर्वक; गम्भीरतापूर्वक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गम्भीरतापूर्वक__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भोलिपल्टै; भोलिपल्टै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भोलिपल्टै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्वेच्छानुसार; स्वेच्छानुसार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्वेच्छानुसार__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पुनः; पुनः; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पुनः__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कतिन्ज्याल; कतिन्ज्याल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कतिन्ज्याल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="जाँ"><i>जाँ</i><par n="जाँ__"/></e>
    <e lm="चीजहरूभन्दा"><i>चीजहरूभन्दा</i><par n="चीजहरूभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="वायुभन्दा"><i>वायुभन्दा</i><par n="वायुभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पढ्नुभन्दा"><i>पढ्नुभन्दा</i><par n="पढ्नुभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="भोलि-भोलि"><i>भोलि-भोलि</i><par n="भोलि-भोलि__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अवस्य"><i>अवस्य</i><par n="अवस्य__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बाबुभन्दा"><i>बाबुभन्दा</i><par n="बाबुभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="लमतन्न"><i>लमतन्न</i><par n="लमतन्न__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="गललल"><i>गललल</i><par n="गललल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बरर्र"><i>बरर्र</i><par n="बरर्र__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="भएपश्चात"><i>भएपश्चात</i><par n="भएपश्चात__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यतिञ्जेल"><i>त्यतिञ्जेल</i><par n="त्यतिञ्जेल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="खुव"><i>खुव</i><par n="खुव__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="स्वाभावतया"><i>स्वाभावतया</i><par n="स्वाभावतया__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="समाधानार्थ"><i>समाधानार्थ</i><par n="समाधानार्थ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="नचाही-नचाहीकन"><i>नचाही-नचाहीकन</i><par n="नचाही-नचाहीकन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="वाहिरै"><i>वाहिरै</i><par n="वाहिरै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="याँ"><i>याँ</i><par n="याँ__"/></e>
    <e lm="पाउनेवित्तिकै"><i>पाउनेवित्तिकै</i><par n="पाउनेवित्तिकै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="माथी"><i>माथी</i><par n="माथी__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="एक-दुइपल्ट"><i>एक-दुइपल्ट</i><par n="एक-दुइपल्ट__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जानाजानी"><i>जानाजानी</i><par n="जानाजानी__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बल्लतल्ल"><i>बल्लतल्ल</i><par n="बल्लतल्ल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="नमिले"><i>नमिले</i><par n="नमिले__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पूर्णरुपेण"><i>पूर्णरुपेण</i><par n="पूर्णरुपेण__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="थचक्क"><i>थचक्क</i><par n="थचक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="हतनपत"><i>हतनपत</i><par n="हतनपत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आजकाल"><i>आजकाल</i><par n="आजकाल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="गंम्भीरतापूर्वक"><i>गंम्भीरतापूर्वक</i><par n="गंम्भीरतापूर्वक__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अघिपछि"><i>अघिपछि</i><par n="अघिपछि__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अघिल्"><i>अघिल्</i><par n="अघिल्__"/></e>
    <e lm="शुरूमानै"><i>शुरूमानै</i><par n="शुरूमानै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यहाँ"><i>त्यहाँ</i><par n="त्यहाँ__"/></e>
    <e lm="स्वाँ-स्वाँ"><i>स्वाँ-स्वाँ</i><par n="स्वाँ-स्वाँ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बिरुद्ध"><i>बिरुद्ध</i><par n="बिरुद्ध__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जनमनोभावानुकूल"><i>जनमनोभावानुकूल</i><par n="जनमनोभावानुकूल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="एकपटक"><i>एकपटक</i><par n="एकपटक__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यहीबेला"><i>त्यहीबेला</i><par n="त्यहीबेला__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जहींतहीं"><i>जहींतहीं</i><par n="जहींतहीं__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="गम्भीरतापूर्वक"><i>गम्भीरतापूर्वक</i><par n="गम्भीरतापूर्वक__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="भोलिपल्टै"><i>भोलिपल्टै</i><par n="भोलिपल्टै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="स्वेच्छानुसार"><i>स्वेच्छानुसार</i><par n="स्वेच्छानुसार__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पुनः"><i>पुनः</i><par n="पुनः__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कतिन्ज्याल"><i>कतिन्ज्याल</i><par n="कतिन्ज्याल__adv"/></e>
